Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2141.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1601.2-E(b)(1) and (2) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, are amended to read:Section 1601.2-E. Oil and Gas Lease Fund.* * *(b) Sources.--The following shall be deposited into the fund:(1) [Rents] Except as provided under section 1798.1-E(h)(3)(i), rents and royalties from oil and gas leases of land owned by the Commonwealth, except rents and royalties received from game and fish lands.(2) [Amounts] Except as provided under section 1798.1-E(h)(3)(ii), amounts as provided under section 5 of the act of October 8, 2012 (P.L.1194, No.147), known as the Indigenous Mineral Resources Development Act.* * *Section 2. Section 1798.1-E(b) and (g) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.550, No.54) and November 12, 2025 (P.L.156, No.45), are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1798.1-E. Federal and Commonwealth use of forest land.* * *(b) Charge.--Except as provided under subsection (g), the following shall apply:(1) For land owned by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, subject to subsection (c), real property 20260HB2141PN2766 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 under subsection (a) shall be subject to an annual charge of all of the following:(i) For the benefit of each county where the real property is located:(A) Three dollars per acre [for the benefit of each county where the real property is located]. One dollar and twenty cents shall be paid by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources and $1.80 shall be paid from money available under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1403 (relating to establishment of State Gaming Fund and net slot machine revenue distribution).(B) The per-acre amount determined under subsection (e)(4).(ii) For the benefit of the schools in each school district where the real property is located:(A) Three dollars per acre [for the benefit of the schools in each school district where the real property is located]. One dollar and twenty cents shall be paid by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources and $1.80 shall be paid from money available under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1403.(B) The per-acre amount determined under subsection (e)(4).(iii) For the benefit of the township where the real property is located:(A) Three dollars per acre [for the benefit of the township where the real property is located]. One dollar and twenty cents shall be paid by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources and 20260HB2141PN2766 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1.80 shall be paid from money available under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1403.(B) The per-acre amount determined under subsection (e)(4).* * *(e.1) Additional payments.--The State Treasurer shall pay to political subdivisions under subsection (d) the following amounts:(1) The amount deposited into the Forest Reserves Municipal Relief Supplement Account for the prior fiscal year ending June 30.(2) The per-acre supplemental payment amount under subsection (b)(1)(i)(B), (ii)(B) and (iii)(B), calculated by dividing the amount under paragraph (3) by the number of acres for which payment is due under subsection (b)(1).(g) Adjustments based on Consumer Price Index.--Beginning in fiscal year 2030-2031, and every five years thereafter, the Secretary of the Budget shall increase the amounts of the payments under subsection [(b)] ( b)(1)(i)(A), (ii)(A), (iii)(A) and (2) by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area between July 1 of the fiscal year in which the amounts last went into effect and July 1 of the fiscal year in which the next increases will take effect. The increases shall take effect on July 1 of the first year of each five-year period. The secretary shall determine the percentage increase and the new amounts based on the most recently reported Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor 20260HB2141PN2766 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Statistics and shall transmit notice of the percentage increase and new amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin no later than August 31 of each fiscal year in which the increases take effect. When determining the increases and amount, the secretary shall take the following into account:(1) The amounts in subsection [(b)] ( b)(1)(i)(A), (ii) (A), (iii)(A) and (2) may not be increased by more than 10%.(2) Payment of the increased amounts under this subsection shall be allocated equally between the funding available to the agency for the payments under subsection (b)(1) and the funding available under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1403 (relating to establishment of State Gaming Fund and net slot machine revenue distribution).(3) Payment of the increased amounts under this subsection shall be allocated between the funding available to the agencies under subsection (b)(2) and the funding available under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1403 in the same proportions as specified in subsection (b)(2).( h) Forest Reserves Municipal Relief Supplement Account.-- (1) There is established a restricted account in the General Fund to be known as the Forest Reserves Municipal Relief Supplement Account.(2) Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the State Treasurer for the payment of amounts under subsection (b)(1)(i)(B), (ii)(B) and (iii)(B).(3) Twenty percent of the following amounts shall be deposited into the account:(i) Rents, royalties and other payments received by the Commonwealth from oil and gas leases of land owned by 20260HB2141PN2766 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Commonwealth, except game and fish lands.(ii) Amounts as provided under section 5 of the act of October 8, 2012 (P.L.1194, No.147), known as the Indigenous Mineral Resources Development Act.(iii) Rents, royalties and other payments received by the Commonwealth from timber sales on land owned by the Commonwealth, except rents, royalties and other payments received from game and fish lands.(iv) Rents, royalties and other payments received by the Commonwealth from the construction or placement of radio towers on land owned by the Commonwealth, except game and fish lands.(v) State park user fees.(vi) Rents, royalties and other payments received by the Commonwealth from energy development on land owned by the Commonwealth, including the construction or placement of solar or wind electricity generating facilities, except game and fish lands.(vii) Any other money appropriated or transferred to the account.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2141PN2766 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021